Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2186.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-1595, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1595. Failure to stop or provide driver license or evidence of identity; violation; classification A. The operator of a motor vehicle who knowingly fails or refuses to bring the operator's motor vehicle to a stop after being given a visual or audible signal or instruction by a peace officer or duly authorized agent of a traffic enforcement agency is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor. B. After stopping as required by subsection A of this section, the operator of a motor vehicle who fails or refuses to exhibit the operator's driver license as required by section 28-3169 or a driver who is not licensed and who fails or refuses to provide evidence of the driver's identity on request is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor. The evidence of identity that is presented shall contain all of the following information: 1. The driver's full name. 2. The driver's date of birth. 3. The driver's residence address. 4. A brief physical description of the driver, including the driver's sex, weight, height and eye and hair color. 5. The driver's signature. C. A person other than the driver of a motor vehicle who fails or refuses to provide evidence of the person's identity to a peace officer or a duly authorized agent of a traffic enforcement agency on request, when such officer or agent has reasonable cause to believe the person has committed a violation of this title, is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor.  The evidence of the person's identity may be provided verbally by the person and shall include the person's: 1. Full name. 2. Date of birth. 3. Residence address, if applicable. D. A peace officer or duly authorized agent of a traffic enforcement agency may give the signal or instruction required by subsection A of this section by hand, emergency light, voice, whistle or siren. E. A person shall not be convicted of a violation of subsection B of this section if the person provided evidence of identity required by subsection B, paragraphs 1 through 5 of this section and produces to the court a legible driver license or an authorized duplicate of the license that is issued to the person and that was valid at the time the violation of subsection B of this section occurred. END_STATUTE